District of Columbia statutes.
7-1141.04

Duties of Director.

In addition to other duties as may be lawfully imposed, the Director shall:

(1)

Supervise and direct the Department;

(2)

Organize the Department for its efficient operation, including creating offices within the Department, as necessary; and

(3)

Exercise any other powers necessary and appropriate to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5115, 60 DCR 12472
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5115 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5115 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 5111 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.